Utah statutes.
62A-15-644.   Additional powers of director -- Reports and records of division.

(1)  In addition to specific authority granted by other provisions of this part, the director has authority to prescribe the form of applications, records, reports, and medical certificates provided for under this part, and the information required to be contained therein, and to adopt rules that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this part that he finds to be reasonably necessary for the proper and efficient commitment of mentally ill persons.

(2)  The division shall require reports relating to the admission, examination, diagnosis, release, or discharge of any patient and investigate complaints made by any patient or by any person on behalf of a patient.

(3)  A local mental health authority shall keep a record of the names and current status of all persons involuntarily committed to it under this chapter.

